South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S576.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.   The regulations of the Attorney General, relating to Securities Exemptions, designated as Regulation Document Number 5365, and submitted to the General Assembly pursuant to the provisions of Article 1, Chapter 23, Title 1 of the S.C. Code, are approved. SECTION 2.   This joint resolution takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XXX---- SUMMARY AS SUBMITTED BY PROMULGATING AGENCY. The Office of the Attorney General proposes to update, amend, and promulgate regulations regarding exemptions from registrations requirements, including for securities offerings relying on S.C. Code Ann Section 35-1-202(2), advisers to certain private funds, and merger and acquisition brokers. The Notice of Drafting regarding this regulation was published on September 27, 2024, in the State Register. ----XX----